Utah statutes.
41-1a-1502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  "Event data" means records of one or more of the following categories of information regarding a motor vehicle that are captured by an event data recorder:

(i)  whether the vehicle's air bag deployed;

(ii)  vehicle speed;

(iii)  vehicle steering performance;

(iv)  vehicle brake performance or use; or

(v)  vehicle seatbelt status or use.

(b)  "Event data" does not include audio and video data.

(2)  "Event data recorder" has the same meaning as defined in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 563.5 as in effect on May 14, 2013.

(3) (a)  "Owner" means:

(i)  a person having all the incidents of ownership of a motor vehicle, including legal title to the motor vehicle;

(ii)  a person entitled to possession of a motor vehicle as the purchaser under a security agreement; or

(iii)  a person entitled to possession of a motor vehicle as a lessee under a written lease agreement if the lease agreement is intended to last for more than three months at its inception.

(b)  "Owner" does not include a lienholder unless the lienholder gains possession of the motor vehicle because the person entitled to possession of a motor vehicle as the purchaser under a security agreement defaults on the loan.



Enacted by Chapter 189, 2013 General Session

